Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2005.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 3204(b) and (c) and 3205(a) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 3204. Medical consultation and judgment.* * *[(b) Requirements.--Except in a medical emergency where there is insufficient time before the abortion is performed, the woman upon whom the abortion is to be performed shall have a private medical consultation either with the physician who is to perform the abortion or with the referring physician. The consultation will be in a place, at a time and of a duration reasonably sufficient to enable the physician to determine whether, based on his best clinical judgment, the abortion is necessary.]123456789101112131415161718 (c) Factors.--In determining in accordance with subsection (a) [or (b)] whether an abortion is necessary, a physician's best clinical judgment may be exercised in the light of all factors (physical, emotional, psychological, familial and the woman's age) relevant to the well-being of the woman. No abortion which is sought solely because of the sex of the unborn child shall be deemed a necessary abortion.* * *§ 3205. Informed consent.(a) General rule.--No abortion shall be performed or induced except with the voluntary and informed consent of the woman upon whom the abortion is to be performed or induced. [Except in the case of a medical emergency, consent to an abortion is voluntary and informed if and only if:(1) At least 24 hours prior to the abortion, the physician who is to perform the abortion or the referring physician has orally informed the woman of:(i) The nature of the proposed procedure or treatment and of those risks and alternatives to the procedure or treatment that a reasonable patient would consider material to the decision of whether or not to undergo the abortion.(ii) The probable gestational age of the unborn child at the time the abortion is to be performed.(iii) The medical risks associated with carrying her child to term.(2) At least 24 hours prior to the abortion, the physician who is to perform the abortion or the referring physician, or a qualified physician assistant, health care practitioner, technician or social worker to whom the 20250HB2005PN2469 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 responsibility has been delegated by either physician, has informed the pregnant woman that:(i) The department publishes printed materials which describe the unborn child and list agencies which offer alternatives to abortion and that she has a right to review the printed materials and that a copy will be provided to her free of charge if she chooses to review it.(ii) Medical assistance benefits may be available for prenatal care, childbirth and neonatal care, and that more detailed information on the availability of such assistance is contained in the printed materials published by the department.(iii) The father of the unborn child is liable to assist in the support of her child, even in instances where he has offered to pay for the abortion. In the case of rape, this information may be omitted.(3) A copy of the printed materials has been provided to the pregnant woman if she chooses to view these materials.(4) The pregnant woman certifies in writing, prior to the abortion, that the information required to be provided under paragraphs (1), (2) and (3) has been provided.]* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2005PN2469 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324